California statutes. Public Resources Code
(iii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (III), all contractors and subcontractors at every tier shall maintain and verify payroll records under Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as
 provided by that section.

(II) Except as provided in subclause (III), the obligation of all contractors and subcontractors at every tier to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment under Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed under Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages under Section 1742.1 of the Labor
 Code.

(III) Subclauses (I) and (II) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing work on the project or contract are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the project or contract and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(iv) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the
 Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing shall not apply if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker. The requirement to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude use of an alternative workweek schedule adopted under Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.

(2) Certify to the lead agency that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the project or contract. All of the following requirements shall apply to the project:

(A) The applicant shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every
 tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project.

(B) Every contractor and subcontractor at every tier shall use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the project.

(C) (i) Except as provided in clause (ii), the applicant shall provide to the lead agency, on a monthly basis while the project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. A monthly report provided to the lead agency under this clause shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection. An applicant that
 fails to provide a monthly report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided. Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments under Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed under the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement
 Fund.

(ii) Clause (i) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors at every tier performing work on the project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 28, Sec. 137.   (SB 1380)   Effective January 1, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21183.6.

(a) The quantification and mitigation of the impacts of a project described in paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21180 from the emissions of greenhouse gases shall be as follows:

(1) The environmental baseline for greenhouse gas emissions shall be established based upon the physical environmental conditions in the vicinity of the project site at the time the application is submitted in a manner consistent with Section 15125 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations as those regulations existed on January 1, 2021.

(2) The mitigation of the impacts resulting from the emissions of greenhouse gases shall be achieved in accordance with the following
 priority:

(A) Direct emissions reductions from the project that also reduce emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants through implementation of project features, project design, or other measures, including, but not limited to, energy efficiency, installation of renewable energy electricity generation, and reductions in vehicle miles traveled.

(B) If all of the project impacts cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated by direct emissions reductions as described in subparagraph (A), the remaining unmitigated impacts shall be mitigated by direct emissions reductions that also reduce emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants within the same air pollution control district or air quality management district in which the project is located.

(C) If all of the project impacts cannot be
 feasibly and fully mitigated by direct emissions reductions as described in subparagraph (A) or (B), the remaining unmitigated impacts shall be mitigated through the use of offsets that originate within the same air pollution control district or air quality management district in which the project is located. The offsets shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the offsets be real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable, and enforceable, and shall be undertaken from sources in the community in which the project is located or in adjacent communities.

(D) If all of the project impacts cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated by the measures described in subparagraph (A), (B), or (C), the remaining unmitigated impacts shall be mitigated through the use of offsets that originate from sources that provide a specific,
 quantifiable, and direct environmental and public health benefit to the region in which the project is located.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this section, to maximize the environmental and public health benefits from measures to mitigate the project impacts resulting from the emissions of greenhouse gases to those people that are impacted most by the project.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21184.

(a) The Governor may certify a project for streamlining under this chapter if it complies with the conditions specified in Section 21183.

(b) (1) Before certifying a project, the Governor shall make a determination that each of the conditions specified in Section 21183 have been met. These findings are not subject to judicial review.

(2) (A) If the Governor determines that a leadership project is eligible for streamlining under this chapter, the Governor shall submit that determination, and any supporting information, to the Joint Legislative Budget Committee for review and concurrence or nonconcurrence.

(B) Within 30 days of receiving the determination, the Joint Legislative Budget Committee shall concur or nonconcur in writing on the determination.

(C) If the Joint Legislative Budget Committee fails to concur or nonconcur on a determination by the Governor within 30 days of the submittal, the leadership project is deemed to be certified.

(c) The Governor may issue guidelines regarding application and certification of projects under this chapter. Any guidelines issued under this subdivision are not subject to the rulemaking provisions of the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21184.5.

(a) Notwithstanding any other law, except as provided in subdivision (b), a multifamily residential project certified under this chapter shall provide unbundled parking, such that private vehicle parking spaces are priced and rented or purchased separately from dwelling units.

(b) Subdivision (a) shall not apply if the dwelling units are subject to affordability restrictions in law that prescribe rent or sale prices, and the cost of parking spaces cannot be unbundled from the cost of dwelling units.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21184.7.

The Office of Planning and Research may charge a fee to an applicant seeking certification under this chapter for the costs incurred by the Governor’s office in implementing this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21185.

The Judicial Council shall adopt a rule of court to establish procedures that require actions or proceedings brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul the certification of an environmental impact report for an environmental leadership development project certified by the Governor under this chapter or the granting of any project approvals that require the actions or proceedings, including any potential appeals to the court of appeal or the Supreme Court, to be resolved, to the extent feasible, within 270 days of the filing of the certified record of proceedings with the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21186.

Notwithstanding any other law, the preparation and certification of the record of proceedings for a leadership project certified by the Governor shall be performed in the following manner:

(a) The lead agency for the project shall prepare the record of proceedings under this division concurrently with the administrative process.

(b) All documents and other materials placed in the record of proceedings shall be posted on, and be downloadable from, an internet website maintained by the lead agency commencing with the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report.

(c) The lead agency shall make available to the public in a readily accessible
 electronic format the draft environmental impact report and all other documents submitted to, or relied on by, the lead agency in preparing the draft environmental impact report.

(d) Any document prepared by the lead agency or submitted by the applicant after the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report that is a part of the record of the proceedings shall be made available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days after the document is released or received by the lead agency.

(e) The lead agency shall encourage written comments on the project to be submitted in a readily accessible electronic format, and shall make any comment available to the public in a readily accessible electronic format within five days of its receipt.

(f) Within seven days after the receipt of
 any comment that is not in an electronic format, the lead agency shall convert that comment into a readily accessible electronic format and make it available to the public in that format.

(g) Notwithstanding paragraphs (b) to (f), inclusive, documents submitted to or relied on by the lead agency that were not prepared specifically for the project and are copyright protected are not required to be made readily accessible in an electronic format. For those copyright-protected documents, the lead agency shall make an index of these documents available in an electronic format no later than the date of the release of the draft environmental impact report, or within five days if the document is received or relied on by the lead agency after the release of the draft environmental impact report. The index must specify the libraries or lead agency offices in which hardcopies of the copyrighted materials are available for public review.

(h) The lead agency shall certify the final record of proceedings within five days of its approval of the project.

(i) Any dispute arising from the record of proceedings shall be resolved by the superior court. Unless the superior court directs otherwise, a party disputing the content of the record shall file a motion to augment the record at the time it files its initial brief.

(j) The contents of the record of proceedings shall be as set forth in subdivision (e) of Section 21167.6.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21187.

Within 10 days of the Governor certifying an environmental leadership development project under this chapter, a lead agency shall, at the applicant’s expense, issue a public notice in no less than 12-point type stating the following:
“THE APPLICANT HAS ELECTED TO PROCEED UNDER CHAPTER 6.5 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21178) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE, WHICH PROVIDES, AMONG OTHER THINGS, THAT ANY JUDICIAL ACTION CHALLENGING THE CERTIFICATION OF THE ENVIRONMENTAL IMPACT REPORT (EIR) OR THE APPROVAL OF THE PROJECT DESCRIBED IN THE EIR IS SUBJECT TO THE PROCEDURES SET FORTH IN SECTIONS 21185 TO 21186, INCLUSIVE, OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE. A COPY OF CHAPTER 6.5 (COMMENCING WITH SECTION 21178) OF DIVISION 13 OF THE PUBLIC RESOURCES CODE IS INCLUDED
 BELOW.”
The public notice shall be distributed by the lead agency as required for public notices issued under paragraph (3) of subdivision (b) of Section 21092.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21187.5.

(a) For purposes of this section, “project alternative” means an alternative studied in a leadership project’s environmental impact report under Section 15126.6 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations as those regulations existed on January 1, 2021.

(b) Before a lead agency’s approval of a project alternative described in an environmental impact report for a leadership project certified by the Governor under this chapter, the Governor may, upon application of the applicant, certify the project alternative under this chapter if the project alternative meets the definition of a leadership project pursuant to Section 21180 and complies with Section 21183 as those sections existed at the time of the Governor’s certification of the
 leadership project. The applicant shall supply evidence and materials that the Governor deems necessary to make a decision on the application to certify the project alternative. Any evidence or materials provided by the applicant shall be made available by the Governor to the public at least 15 days before the Governor certifies a project alternative pursuant to this chapter. Paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 21184 shall not apply to the certification of a project alternative pursuant to this section. The findings made by the Governor pursuant to this section are not subject to judicial review.

(c) The rule of court adopted under Section 21185 applies to actions or proceedings brought to attack, review, set aside, void, or annul a public agency’s approval of a project alternative certified under this section on the grounds of noncompliance with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21188.

The provisions of this chapter are severable. If any provision of this chapter or its application is held to be invalid, that invalidity shall not affect any other provision or application that can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.

Except as otherwise provided expressly in this chapter, nothing in this chapter affects the duty of any party to comply with this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 2021, Ch. 19, Sec. 1.   (SB 7)   Effective May 20, 2021.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.1.

If, before January 1, 2033, a lead agency fails to approve a project certified by the Governor under this chapter, then the certification expires and is no longer valid.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 4.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, pursuant to Section 21189.3.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.3.

This chapter shall remain in effect until January 1, 2034, and as of that date is repealed unless a later enacted statute extends or repeals that date.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 60, Sec. 5.   (SB 149)   Effective July 10, 2023.   Repealed as of January 1, 2034, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6.5, commencing with Section 21178.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6.9. Old Town Center Redevelopment in the City of San Diego [21189.70. - 21189.70.10.]

21189.70.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions apply:

(a) “Lead agency” or “public agency” means SANDAG.

(b) “Navy” means the United States Department of the Navy.

(c) “Old Town Center site” means the approximately 70.5-acres comprising the Naval Base Point Loma’s Old Town Center.

(d) “Project labor agreement” has the same meaning as in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 2500 of the Public Contract Code.

(e) “SANDAG” means the San Diego Association of
 Governments.

(f) “Site control” means a lease agreement, property transfer, or other property conveyance from the Navy to SANDAG related to transit and transportation facilities.

(g) “Site plan” means the site development plan approved, on or before December 31, 2022, by the Navy and SANDAG for the Old Town Center site that complies with the content requirements specified in subdivision (a) of Section 65451 of the Government Code and Section 65452 of the Government Code.

(h) “Skilled and trained workforce” has the same meaning as provided in Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code.

(i) “Transit and transportation facilities” means a multimodal regional transportation
 facility, including a central mobility hub located in the Old Town Center site, and transportation linkages that connect the central mobility hub to the San Diego regional transportation system, as that transportation system existed as of December 31, 2020, and that connect the central mobility hub to the San Diego International Airport. A transit and transportation facility does not include a transit station or hub that is located outside of the Old Town Center site. The central mobility hub may include a multimodal transportation center that may include a high-frequency automated people mover service and one of the following:

(1) A nonstop, high-speed service to San Diego International Airport via a one-mile tunnel route.

(2) Service to San Diego International Airport via a 3.6 mile surface or elevated automated people mover route along the Pacific Highway, Laurel Street, and
 Harbor Drive with intermediate stops at the airport rental car center and the planned development at Harbor Island East Basin.

(3) An airport-like curb experience for auto-based travelers, an automated people mover station that would provide services to San Diego International Airport via a 2.6 mile surface or elevated route along the Pacific Highway, Laurel Street, and Harbor Drive, with intermediate stops at the airport rental car center and planned development at the Harbor Island East Basin.

(j) “Transit-oriented development project” means a project for the redevelopment of the Old Town Center site that substantially conforms to the description of the proposed action for the Navy Old Town Campus Revitalization at Naval Base Point Loma, California, set forth in the notice of intent to prepare an environmental impact statement published in the Federal Register on January 24,
 2020, and that includes up to 10,000 residential units and up to 1,600,000 square feet of office and retail space, and one of the following:

(1) High-density mixed-use revitalization, including a transit center.

(2) Low-density mixed-use revitalization, including a transit center.

(History: Added by Stats. 2020, Ch. 291, Sec. 2.   (AB 2731)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.1.

(a) For purposes of this section, the following definitions apply:

(1) “Employment center project” means a project with a floor area ratio of no less than 0.75 and that is located within a transit priority area.

(2) “Floor area ratio” has the same meaning as in Section 21099.

(3) “Transit priority area” has the same meaning as in Section 21099.

(b) Except as provided in subdivision (c), the requirements of this division are satisfied by an environmental impact statement prepared pursuant to
 the notice of intent described in subdivision (i) of Section 21189.70 and that meets the requirements of subdivision (d) for a transit-oriented development project, including a residential, employment center, or mixed-use development project, approved by the lead agency, located in the Old Town Center site, if the transit-oriented development project meets all of the following criteria:

(1) The transit-oriented development project is proposed within a transit priority area.

(2) (A) The transit-oriented development project is undertaken to implement and is consistent with the land use standards approved by the Navy and SANDAG for the Old Town Center site and the site plan for which the environmental impact report has been certified on or before December 31,
 2022.

(B) The site plan shall meet a vehicle miles traveled reduction of 25 percent below the regional average vehicle miles traveled identified in the sustainable communities strategy or alternative planning strategy applicable at the time of the approval of the site plan.

(3) The transit-oriented development project is consistent with the general use designation, density, building intensity, and applicable policies specified in the Old Town Center site in either a sustainable communities strategy or an alternative planning strategy for which the State Air Resources Board, pursuant to subparagraph (H) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 65080 of the Government Code, has accepted SANDAG’s determination that the sustainable communities strategy or the alternative
 planning strategy would, if implemented, achieve the greenhouse gas emissions reduction targets.

(4) (A) For a transit-oriented development project undertaken by a public agency, except as provided in subparagraph (B), an entity shall not be prequalified or short-listed or awarded a contract by the public agency to perform any portion of the transit-oriented development project unless the entity provides an enforceable commitment to the public agency that the entity and its subcontractors at every tier will use a skilled and trained workforce to perform all work on the transit-oriented development project or contract that falls within an apprenticeable occupation in the building and construction trades.

(B) Subparagraph (A) does not apply if any of the following requirements
 are met:

(i) The public agency has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit-oriented development project or contract to use a skilled and trained workforce, and the entity agrees to be bound by that project labor agreement.

(ii) The transit-oriented development project or contract is being performed under the extension or renewal of a project labor agreement that was entered into by the public agency before January 1, 2021.

(iii) The entity has entered into a project labor agreement that will bind the entity and all of its subcontractors at every tier performing the transit-oriented development project or contract to use a skilled and
 trained workforce.

(5) For a transit-oriented development project undertaken by a private entity, the transit-oriented development project applicant shall do both of the following:

(A) Certify to the lead agency that either of the following is true:

(i) The entirety of the transit-oriented development project is a public work for purposes of Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1720) of Part 7 of Division 2 of the Labor Code.

(ii) If the transit-oriented development project is not in its entirety a public work, all construction workers employed in the execution of the transit-oriented development project will be paid at least the general prevailing rate of
 per diem wages for the type of work and geographic area, as determined by the Director of Industrial Relations pursuant to Sections 1773 and 1773.9 of the Labor Code, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate. If
 the transit-oriented development project is subject to this clause, then, for those portions of the transit-oriented development project that are not a public work, all of the following shall apply:

(I) The transit-oriented development project applicant shall ensure that the prevailing wage requirement is included in all contracts for the performance of the work.

(II) All contractors and subcontractors shall pay to all construction workers employed in the execution of the work at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages, except that apprentices registered in programs approved by the Chief of the Division of Apprenticeship Standards may be paid at least the applicable apprentice prevailing rate.

(III) Except as provided in subclause (V), all contractors and subcontractors shall maintain and verify payroll records pursuant to Section 1776 of the Labor Code and make those records available for inspection and copying as provided by that section.

(IV) Except as provided in subclause (V), the obligation of the contractors and subcontractors to pay prevailing wages may be enforced by the Labor Commissioner through the issuance of a civil wage and penalty assessment pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, which may be reviewed pursuant to Section 1742 of the Labor Code, within 18 months after the completion of the transit-oriented development project, by an underpaid worker through an administrative complaint or civil action, or by a joint labor-management committee through a civil action under Section 1771.2 of the Labor
 Code. If a civil wage and penalty assessment is issued, the contractor, subcontractor, and surety on a bond or bonds issued to secure the payment of wages covered by the assessment shall be liable for liquidated damages pursuant to Section 1742.1 of the Labor Code.

(V) Subclauses (III) and (IV) do not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit-oriented development project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires the payment of prevailing wages to all construction workers employed in the execution of the transit-oriented development project and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(VI) Notwithstanding subdivision (c) of Section 1773.1 of the Labor Code, the requirement that employer payments
 not reduce the obligation to pay the hourly straight time or overtime wages found to be prevailing shall not apply if otherwise provided in a bona fide collective bargaining agreement covering the worker. The requirement to pay at least the general prevailing rate of per diem wages does not preclude the use of an alternative workweek
 schedule adopted pursuant to Section 511 or 514 of the Labor Code.

(B) Certify to the lead agency that a skilled and trained workforce will be used to perform all construction work on the transit-oriented development project. All of the following requirements shall apply to the transit-oriented development project:

(i) The transit-oriented development project applicant shall require in all contracts for the performance of work that every contractor and subcontractor at every tier will individually use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the transit-oriented development project.

(ii) Every contractor and subcontractor shall use a skilled and trained workforce to complete the
 transit-oriented development project.

(iii) (I) Except as provided in subclause (II), the transit-oriented development project applicant shall provide to the lead agency, on a monthly basis while the transit-oriented development project or contract is being performed, a report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code. A monthly report provided to the lead agency pursuant to this subclause shall be a public record under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) and shall be open to public inspection. A transit-oriented development project applicant that fails to provide a monthly report demonstrating compliance with Chapter 2.9 (commencing with Section
 2600) of Part 1 of Division 2 of the Public Contract Code shall be subject to a civil penalty of ten thousand dollars ($10,000) per month for each month for which the report has not been provided. Any contractor or subcontractor that fails to use a skilled and trained workforce shall be subject to a civil penalty of two hundred dollars ($200) per day for each worker employed in contravention of the skilled and trained workforce requirement. Penalties may be assessed by the Labor Commissioner within 18 months of completion of the transit-oriented development project using the same procedures for issuance of civil wage and penalty assessments pursuant to Section 1741 of the Labor Code, and may be reviewed pursuant to the same procedures in Section 1742 of the Labor Code. Penalties shall be paid to the State Public Works Enforcement Fund.

(II) Subclause (I) does not apply if all contractors and subcontractors performing work on the transit-oriented development project are subject to a project labor agreement that requires compliance with the skilled and trained workforce requirement and provides for enforcement of that obligation through an arbitration procedure.

(c) Further environmental review, including the preparation of a supplemental environmental impact report, if appropriate, shall be conducted only if any of the events specified in Section 21166 have occurred.

(d) (1) Pursuant to Section 21083.5, the environmental impact statement prepared by the Navy for the redevelopment of the Old Town Center site pursuant to the federal National Environmental Policy Act of 1969 (42
 U.S.C. Sec. 4321 et seq.) may be used in lieu of all or any part of an environmental impact report prepared pursuant to this division for the redevelopment of the Old Town Center site if that statement complies with the applicable requirements of this division and the guidelines adopted pursuant to this division and its use for purposes of compliance with this division shall not in and of itself constitute a prejudicial abuse of discretion so long as the lead agency consults with the Navy, notifies the Navy regarding any scoping meetings for the proposed transit-oriented development project, and a discussion of mitigation measures or growth-inducing impacts are included in the environmental impact statement.

(2) Paragraph (1) is not intended to exempt approvals of public agencies from the requirements of Section 21081, 21081.6, 21100, or
 21151, or to limit judicial review of those approvals under Section 21168.

(3) Any significant impacts identified in the Navy’s environmental impact statement for the redevelopment of the Old Town Center site that are offsite of the Old Town Center site and that are incorporated by the lead agency into the environmental impact report shall be subject to the applicable mitigation requirements and enforcement provisions of this division.

(e) The approval of a transit-oriented development project shall be preceded by a determination under subdivisions (b) and (c).

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 615, Sec. 382.   (AB 474)   Effective January 1, 2022.   Operative January 1, 2023, pursuant to Sec. 463 of Stats. 2021, Ch. 615.)
-------------------------------------------

21189.70.2.

A transit and transportation facilities project subject to this chapter shall meet all of the following requirements:

(a) Any facility that is a part of the transit and transportation facilities project shall obtain Leadership in Energy and Environmental Design (LEED) gold certification for new construction within one year of the transit and transportation facilities project completion.

(b) (1) The project does not result in any net additional emission of greenhouse gases, as determined by the State Air Resources Board pursuant to Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code. The State Air Resources Board is encouraged to make its determination
 no later than 120 calendar days after receiving an application for review of the methodology and calculations of the project’s greenhouse gas emissions.

(2) The environmental baseline for greenhouse gas emissions shall be established based upon the physical conditions at the project site at the time the notice of preparation for the project-level environmental impact report is published in a manner consistent with Section 15125 of Title 14 of the California Code of Regulations as those regulations existed on January 1, 2020.

(3) To maximize public health and environmental benefits, the lead agency shall require measures that will reduce the emissions of greenhouse gases in the project area and in the neighboring communities.

(4) Not less than 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve
 the requirement of this subdivision shall be from local, direct greenhouse gas emissions reduction measures, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(A) Project design features or onsite reduction measures, or both design features and onsite reduction measures, that include, but are not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Implementing project design features that enable the project to exceed the building energy efficiency standards set forth in Part 6 (commencing with Section 100) of Title 24 of the California Code of Regulations, except for 50 percent of emissions reductions attributable to design features necessary to meet the LEED gold certification requirement.

(ii) Requiring a transportation demand management program to reduce single-occupancy vehicular travel and vehicle miles traveled.

(iii) Providing onsite renewable energy generation, including a solar roof on the project with a minimum peak generation capacity of 500 kilowatts.

(iv) Providing solar-ready roofs.

(v) Providing cool roofs and cool parking promoting cool surface treatment for new parking facilities.

(B) Offsite reduction measures in the neighboring communities, including, but not limited to, any of the following:

(i) Providing funding to an offsite mitigation project consisting of replacing buses, trolleys, or other transit vehicles with zero-emission vehicles.

(ii) Providing offsite safety or other improvements for bicycles, pedestrians, and
 transit connections.

(iii) Undertaking or funding building retrofits to improve the energy efficiency of existing buildings.

(5) (A) The transit and transportation facilities project proponent may obtain offset credits for up to 50 percent of the greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve the requirement of this subdivision that produce emissions reductions within the City of San Diego or the boundaries of the San Diego County Air Pollution Control District. Any offset credits shall be verified by a third party accredited by the State Air Resources Board, and shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the offset be real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable, and enforceable, and shall be undertaken from sources in the
 same community within which the project is located or adjacent communities.

(B) If 50 percent of greenhouse gas emissions reductions necessary to achieve no additional emissions of greenhouse gases cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated by offset credits as described in subparagraph (A), the mitigation of the remaining emissions of greenhouse gases shall be achieved pursuant to the following priority:

(i) Offset credits that would also reduce the emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants. The offsets shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with Division 25.5 (commencing with Section 38500) of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, the requirement that the offsets be real, permanent, quantifiable, verifiable, and enforceable, and shall be undertaken from sources in the community within which the project is located or in adjacent
 communities.

(ii) If the remaining emissions of greenhouse gases cannot be feasibly and fully mitigated by the offset credits described in clause (i), the remaining unmitigated greenhouse gas emissions shall be mitigated through the use of offsets that would also reduce the emissions of criteria air pollutants or toxic air contaminants and shall be undertaken in a manner consistent with clause (i) and shall be undertaken from sources that provide a specific, quantifiable, and direct environmental and public health benefit to the community in which the project is located.

(6) It is the intent of the Legislature, in enacting this subdivision, to maximize the environmental and public health benefits from measures to mitigate the emissions of greenhouse gases of a transit and transportation facilities project to those people that are impacted most by the project.
